District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.03

Referendum ballot and notice of voting.

(a)

The charter referendum ballot shall contain the following, with a blank space appropriately filled:

“The District of Columbia Home Rule Act, enacted _____ , proposes to establish a charter for the governance of the District of Columbia, but provides that the charter shall take effect only if it is accepted by a majority of the registered qualified voters of the District voting on this issue.

“Indicate in one of the squares provided below whether you are for or against the charter.

“□ For the charter

“□ Against the charter.

“In addition, the Act referred to above authorizes the establishment of advisory neighborhood councils if a majority of the registered qualified voters of the District voting on this issue in this referendum vote for the establishment of such councils.

“Indicate in one of the squares provided below whether you are for or against the establishment of Advisory Neighborhood Councils.

“□ For Advisory Neighborhood Councils

“□ Against Advisory Neighborhood Councils.”

(b)

Voting may be by paper ballot or by voting machine. The Board of Elections may make such changes in the second and fourth paragraphs of the charter referendum ballot as it determines to be necessary to permit the use of voting machines if such machines are used.

(c)

Not less than five days before the date of the charter referendum, the Board of Elections shall mail to each registered qualified elector (1) a sample of the charter referendum ballot, and (2) information showing the polling place of such elector and the date and hours of voting.

(d)

Not less than one day before the charter referendum, the Board of Elections shall publish, in one or more newspapers of general circulation published in the District, a list of the polling places and the date and hours of voting.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 703
Apr. 24, 1974, 88 Stat. 93, Pub. L. 93-272, § 1
This section is referenced in § 1-207.38.